apertium_ben_in_canonical_forms.dix
<pardef n="l/e__v">

<!-- verbal noun -->
<e><p><l>enA</l><r>enA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ene</l><r>enA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ewA_huA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewI_huI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewI_huI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewI_huI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewI_huI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>iyA_huA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>









<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_hue</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ewe_rahanA_hE</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="le"><i>l</i><par n="l/e__v"/></e>
<e lm="xe"><i>x</i><par n="l/e__v"/></e>
